Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in  this section, “P.L. 280 jurisdiction” means the authority
granted to this state over specific  criminal and civil matters in a federally recognized Indian
tribe located in this state, under Public Law 280, codified at 18  U.S.C. 1162 and 25 U.S.C. 1321,
and pursuant to:
(a) Public Law 95-195, codified at 25  U.S.C. 711(d)(6), November 18, 1977 (Siletz Indian
Tribe Restoration Act);
(b) Public Law  98-165, codified at 25 U.S.C. 713f(c)(6), November 22, 1983 (Grand Ronde
Restoration Act);
(c) Public Law 98-481, codified at 25  U.S.C. 714e, October 17, 1984 (Coos, Lower Umpqua
and Siuslaw Restoration Act);
(d) Public Law 99-398, codified at 25 U.S.C. 556e, August 27, 1986 (Klamath  Indian Tribe
Restoration Act); and
(e) Public Law 101-42, codified at 25 U.S.C. 715d,  June 28, 1989 (Coquille Restoration Act).
(2)(a) The governing body of a federally recognized Indian tribe located  in this state may
submit to  the Governor a resolution formally adopted by the governing body to request
retrocession of P.L. 280  jurisdiction. The request may be for P.L. 280 jurisdiction
retrocession in whole or in part.
(b) A tribe may request retrocession only on its own behalf.
(3)(a) Within 10 days after the date on which the Governor receives  a request for P.L.
280 jurisdiction retrocession, the Governor shall acknowledge receipt to the requesting tribe.
(b) Within 90 days after the date on which the Governor receives a request  for P.L. 280
jurisdiction retrocession, the Governor shall convene a meeting with  the representatives of
the requesting tribe to discuss the request for P.L.  280 jurisdiction retrocession, including
but not limited to the implications and logistical aspects of the retrocession.
(c) Subject to paragraph (d) of this subsection,  the Governor shall accept or deny a re-
quest for P.L. 280 jurisdiction retrocession  within 180 days after receiving the request and
notify the requesting tribe of the Governor’s decision. If the Governor accepts the  request,
the Governor shall within 10 days after the decision petition the United  States Secretary of
the Interior pursuant  to 25 U.S.C. 1323, and any regulations promulgated thereunder, for P.L.
280 jurisdiction retrocession as described in the request.  The Governor by proclamation may
Enrolled Senate Bill 1011 (SB 1011-INTRO) Page 1
declare intent to petition the  United States Secretary of the Interior as described in this
paragraph. If the  Governor denies the request, the Governor shall identify the reasons for
the denial and communicate in good faith with the requesting tribe regarding the denial.
(d) The Governor and  the requesting tribe may by mutual consent agree to extend the
timeframe described in paragraph (c) of this subsection up to an additional 180 days.
(4) The retrocession of P.L. 280 jurisdiction shall not diminish  or abrogate the sover-
eignty of a tribe that requests retrocession. The tribe shall retain the prerogative to  govern
the tribe’s territory and population in accordance with tribal law, policy and tradition.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate March 31, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 14, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1011 (SB 1011-INTRO) Page 2